src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_vualaas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - vuálááš: # MLO, ok; long dift / long vowel in the 1st syll (comp to cissááš)
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Nom: vuálááš
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Gen: vuáláá
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Acc: vuáláá
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Ill: vuálážân
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Loc: vuáláást
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Com: vuáláin
    vuálááš+N+Sg+Abe: vuálááttáá
    vuálááš+N+Ess: vuálážin # obs: cissáážin (áá)
    vuálááš+N+Par: vuálážid # obs: cissáážid (áá)
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Nom: vuálááh
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Gen: vuálái
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Acc: vuáláid
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Ill: vuáláid
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Loc: vuáláin
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Com: [vuáláiguin, vuáláigijn]
    vuálááš+N+Pl+Abe: vuáláittáá
    
  Noun - kuálááš: # MLO, ok
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Nom: kuálááš
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Gen: kuáláá
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Acc: kuáláá
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Ill: kuálážân
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Loc: kuáláást
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Com: kuáláin
    kuálááš+N+Sg+Abe: kuálááttáá
    kuálááš+N+Ess: kuálážin # obs: cissáážin (áá)
    kuálááš+N+Par: kuálážid # obs: cissáážid (áá)
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Nom: kuálááh
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Gen: kuálái
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Acc: kuáláid
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Ill: kuáláid
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Loc: kuáláin
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Com: [kuáláiguin, kuáláigijn]
    kuálááš+N+Pl+Abe: kuáláittáá

  Noun - káánááš: # MLO, ok
    káánááš+N+Sg+Nom: káánááš
    káánááš+N+Sg+Gen: káánáá
    káánááš+N+Sg+Acc: káánáá
    káánááš+N+Sg+Ill: kánážân
    káánááš+N+Sg+Loc: káánáást
    káánááš+N+Sg+Com: kánáin
    káánááš+N+Sg+Abe: káánááttáá
    káánááš+N+Ess: kánážin # obs: cissáážin (áá)
    káánááš+N+Par: kánážid # obs: cissáážid (áá)
    káánááš+N+Pl+Nom: káánááh
    káánááš+N+Pl+Gen: kánái
    káánááš+N+Pl+Acc: kánáid
    káánááš+N+Pl+Ill: kánáid
    káánááš+N+Pl+Loc: kánáin
    káánááš+N+Pl+Com: [kánáiguin, kánáigijn]
    káánááš+N+Pl+Abe: kánáittáá

 
  Noun - áálááš: # MLO, ok
    áálááš+N+Sg+Nom: áálááš
    áálááš+N+Sg+Gen: ááláá
    áálááš+N+Sg+Acc: ááláá
    áálááš+N+Sg+Ill: álážân
    áálááš+N+Sg+Loc: ááláást
    áálááš+N+Sg+Com: áláin
    áálááš+N+Sg+Abe: áálááttáá
    áálááš+N+Ess: álážin # obs: cissáážin (áá)
    áálááš+N+Par: álážid # obs: cissáážid (áá)
    áálááš+N+Pl+Nom: áálááh
    áálááš+N+Pl+Gen: álái
    áálááš+N+Pl+Acc: áláid
    áálááš+N+Pl+Ill: áláid
    áálááš+N+Pl+Loc: áláin
    áálááš+N+Pl+Com: [áláiguin, áláigijn]
    áálááš+N+Pl+Abe: áláittáá
